dev/guesser/guesser.lexc
LEXICON A4                 ! "pure" adjectives - no adverbial and substantive readings, no comparison levels;
                           !# ұлттық

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# ұлттық тағам

LEXICON A6                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without comparative reading,
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# examples go here

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                           !# example 1
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;           !# example 2
%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;                     !# example 3

LEXICON V-ADJ

# ;
%<subst%>: GER-INFL ; ! Don't be confused by the name of the cont.class,
                      ! it's basically just a simplified FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     VERBAL INFLECTION (V-INFL-COMMON)

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON

! Pointed to by: V-PERS-S1 and V-PERS-AOR
! Irregular p1.sg form is in V-PERS-AOR

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1

! Used for: -AR-<fut>, -GAn-<past>, -MAK-<fut_plan>, copula

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ңд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-AOR

! As the name indicates, used for -{E}-<aor>
! NOTE that: Алма театрға бара<aor><p3><sg> ма? – Алма в театр идёт?

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;                ! Dir/LR

%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>д%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP-NO-QST ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT-QST ;              ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT-QST ;

%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>д%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP-NO-QST ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT-QST ;              ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT-QST ;

LEXICON V-PERS-IFI_EVID

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>т%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>т%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>м%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;             ! Dir/LR

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR/SUBST

%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<subst%>: CASES ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

!! LEXICON GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST
!! 
!! !%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!! %<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!! !%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
!! !%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! 2014-08-16//FMT: this was "GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST"

LEXICON GER-GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<gen%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! 2015-01-18//JNW: added <nom>, since it needs a case for transfer, and no other cases are ever added, or even presumed by the transducer to be okay.  But worth CHECK ing..
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} GER-ATTR/SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSSESSIVES ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   end of gerunds inflection lexicon

LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}с V-PERS-S1 ;

%<fut_plan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut_plan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}% емес V-PERS-S1 ;

%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% емес V-PERS-S1 ;  ! more colloquial than regular negative

%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<neg%>%<ifi%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% жоқ V-PERS-S1 ;    ! more colloquial than regular negative


LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-AOR ;
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S1 ;      ! Dir/LR - see irregular forms above
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;        ! Dir/LR - see irregular forms above
%<pih%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н V-PERS-S1 ;

%<aor%>%<evid%>:%>%{E%}д%{I%}% екен V-PERS-S1 ;    ! барады екенмін / бармайды екенмін
%<past%>%<evid%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% екен V-PERS-S1 ;   ! барған екенмін / бармаған екенмін
%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{I%}п V-PERS-IFI_EVID ;         ! барыппын / бармаппын
%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п V-PERS-IFI_EVID ;    ! бопты   ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% жоқ% екен V-PERS-S1 ; ! барған жоқ екенмін

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;            ! Dir/LR
       ! for things like боп, сап, кеп, қап, қып, etc.
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_vol%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} VOL-ENDINGS ;
%<prc_fplan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prc_fplan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}ш%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;           ! Dir/LR
%<prc_plan%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<gna_until%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нш%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gna_after%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

! Verbal Adjectives
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-ADJ ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%с V-ADJ ;

%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>ст%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;

!%<neg%>%<gpr_pot2%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}с # ; FIXME looks wrong

! Gerunds
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}р GER-POSSESSIVES ;  ! FIXME: check that e.g. no possession + accusative isn't valid (I think it is) -JNW
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>с GER-POSSESSIVES ;

%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}%{K%} GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>ст%{I%}%{K%} GER-POSSESSIVES ;

%<ger_obs%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
! FIXME <ger_obs>:
! - does it have a negative form?  if regular, with -МА,
!   put in the REGULAR_NEGATIVE category
! - does it take possessive forms?  if not, change
!   continuation lexicon to something other than GER-INFL

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<gna_impf%>:%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

! Verbal adjectives
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_impf%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_pot%>:%>у%>ш%{I%} V-ADJ ;

! Gerunds
%<ger%>:%>у GER-INFL ;
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н GER-INFL ;
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_abs%>:%>у%>ш%{I%}%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_impf%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н GER-POSSESSIVES ;

! Imperatives
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%>д%{A%}р CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CLIT-EMPH ;                ! Dir/LR FIXME CHECK
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з%>д%{A%}р CLIT-EMPH ;

! Optative/jussive forms
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;              ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;         ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;

!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! FIXME check
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! FIXME check

LEXICON V-COMMON

V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

LEXICON V-DER

%<coop%>:%>%{I%}с V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV-NOPASS

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-TV-PASS

! e.g. көрін
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     auxiliary verbs

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF

%<vaux%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-S1 ; ! /жүр, жатыр, тұр, отыр/
%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<evid%>:% екен V-PERS-S1 ; ! e.g., "жатыр екенмін"

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF-NEG

%<vaux%>%<neg%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-S1 ; ! /жатқан жоқ/
%<vaux%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<evid%>:% екен V-PERS-S1 ; ! e.g., "жатқан жоқ екенмін"

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX

%<vaux%>: V-COMMON ; ! these four verbs in other tenses and all other aux. verbs

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     copula

LEXICON Copula

е%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:екен GER-POSSESSIVES ;
е%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:екен%>%{L%}%{I%}к GER-POSSESSIVES ;

! This is an evidential aorist form, not past -JNW
е%<cop%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:екен V-PERS-S1 ;
е%<cop%>%<neg%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:емес% екен V-PERS-S1 ;

е%<cop%>%<ifi%>:е%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;

е%<cop%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:емес V-PERS-S1 ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PRONOUN'S INFLECTION

!!!!!!!   P E R S O N A L

LEXICON PRON-P12SG-CASES

%<nom%>:ен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gen%>:енің CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:аған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:ені CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:енен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:енде CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:енімен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>:енікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:ендегі ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:ендей CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<advl%>:еніңше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-P3SG-CASES

%<nom%>:л CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<gen%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:ған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:дан CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:нда CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:нымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>:нікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:ндағы ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:ндай CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<advl%>:ныңша CLITICS-NO-COP ;


LEXICON PRON-PERS-INFL

CASES-ETC ;
